Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3608
City or village; proposed boundaries; contents.

In defining the proposed boundaries of its area of future growth and development, each city or village shall include at least the area over which it formally exercises jurisdiction for purposes of zoning and platting. Each city or village may include in its proposed boundaries of the area of future growth and development such unincorporated lands within the county not more than five miles beyond its corporate limits which the city or village reasonably anticipates will in the future come within the jurisdiction of the city or village for purposes of zoning and platting as a result of long-range future growth. The boundaries of the area of future growth and development proposed by each city or village shall be based upon documented population and economic growth trends and projected patterns of land development and infrastructure improvement. The area of future growth and development of a city or village shall be delineated in conformity with the comprehensive development plan of the city or village or in conformance with the goals and standards in such plan. The governing body of the city or village shall not take formal action on the delineation of its area of future growth and development until it has received a recommendation thereon from its planning commission.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 8.